Georgia, session 2025_26, HB661.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 2 of Title 21 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to elections and
primaries generally, is amended in Code Section 21-2-216, relating to qualifications of
electors generally, reregistration of electors purged from list, eligibility of nonresidents who
vote in presidential elections, retention of qualification for standing as elector, evidence of
citizenship, and check of convicted felons and deceased persons databases, by adding a new
subsection to read as follows:
"(i) Violation of this Code section shall constitute a felony, and upon conviction shall be
punished as provided for in Code Section 21-2-600."
H. B. 661
- 1 -

LC 47 3345
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 661
- 2 -